Tennessee, session 114, SB0996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-104, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
The petitioner shall pay the costs of this application unless the court finds proof
satisfactory that the petitioner is indigent.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to petitions filed on or after that date.
SB0996
002925
- 1 -